District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0706.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,
That this act may be cited as the "Kindergarten and Pre-Kindergarten Enrollment
Flexibility Act of 2026".
TITLE I. COMPULSORY EDUCATION REQUIREMENT AMENDMENTS.
Sec. 101. Short title.
This title may be cited as the "Parental Choice in Kindergarten Deferral
Amendment Act of 2026".
Sec. 102. An Act to provide for compulsory school attendance, for the taking of a
school census in the District of Columbia, and for other purposes, approved February 4,
1925 (43 Stat. 806; D.C. Official Code§ 38-201 et seq.), is amended as follows:

(a) Paragraph (4) of Section 1 of Article I is amended by striking the word
“September” and inserting the word “August” in its place.
(b) Section 1 of Article II is amended as follows
(1) Subsection (a) shall be renumbered as paragraph (a)(1).
(2) A new paragraph (a)(2) shall be added to read as follows:
“(2) Notwithstanding the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection,
a child who reached the age of 5 years or who will become 5 years of age, on or between
the dates of June 16th of the previous school year and September 30th of the current
school year, shall be exempt from the compulsory school attendance requirements,
provided that:
“(A) The parent, guardian, or other person, who resides
permanently or temporarily in the District and who has custody or control of the minor:
“(i) Notifies DCPS, in writing, of their decision to defer
kindergarten enrollment for one year and provides documentation verifying that the child
is enrolled:
“(I) Full-time in a childcare program licensed by the
District of Columbia, Maryland, or Virginia; or
“(II) Full-time in a pre-kindergarten class at a public
school, public charter school, or licensed private school in the District of Columbia,
Maryland, or Virginia; and
“(ii) The minor maintains enrollment in an institution
described in sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph.


“(B) The minor established residency in the District of Columbia
after the start date of the school year for kindergarten at DCPS.”.
TITLE II. KINDERGARTEN AND PRE-KINDERGARTEN APPLICATION
PROCESS AMENDMENTS.
Sec. 101. Short title.
This title may be cited as the "Flexibility in Kindergarten and Pre-Kindergarten
Applications Act of 2026".
Sec. 102. Notwithstanding D.C. Official Code § 38-781.02(b)(1) any parent,
guardian, or other person, who resides permanently or temporarily in the District and who
has custody or control of the minor, shall have the following rights in public school
enrollment and applications:
(a) A child who reached the age of 4 years or who will become 4 years of age, on
or between the dates of June 16th of the previous school year and September 30th of the
current school year, shall be allowed to enroll in either Pre-K3 or Pre-K4 at DCPS or DC
public charter schools;
(b A child who reached the age of 5 years or who will become 5 years of age, on
or between the dates of June 16th of the previous school year and September 30th of the
current school year, shall be allowed to enroll in either Pre-K4 or kindergarten at DCPS
or DC public charter schools; and
(c) A child who reached the age of 6 years or who will become 6 years of age, on
or between the dates of June 16th of the previous school year and September 30th of the
current school year, shall be allowed to enroll in either kindergarten or first grade at
DCPS or DC public charter schools.


Sec. 103. The District shall update the public school lottery application process to
permit parents the ability to apply for enrollment in accordance with Section 102 of this
Act.
TITLE III. FISCAL IMPACT AND EFFECTIVE DATE
Sec. 301. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the
fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act
of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code§ 1-301.47a).
Sec. 302. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto
by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of
congressional review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home
Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-
206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of Columbia Register.